Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-9,117
Preretirement planning program or sessions; for whom; required information; funding; attendance; fee.

(1)(a) Until September 1, 2024, the board of trustees shall establish a comprehensive preretirement planning program for school employees who are members of the retirement system. The program shall provide information and advice regarding the many changes members face upon retirement, including, but not limited to, changes in physical and mental health, housing, family life, leisure activity, and retirement income.

(b) Beginning September 1, 2024, the retirement board shall establish sessions as provided in section 84-1511 for school employees who are members of the retirement system.

(2) The preretirement planning program shall be available to all members.

(3) The preretirement planning program shall include information on the federal and state income tax consequences of the various annuity or retirement benefit options available to the member, information on social security benefits, information on various local, state, and federal government programs and programs in the private sector designed to assist elderly persons, and information and advice the board of trustees or retirement board, as applicable, deems valuable in assisting members in the transition from public employment to retirement.

(4) The board of trustees or retirement board, as applicable, shall work with any governmental agency, including political subdivisions or bodies whose services or expertise may enhance the development or implementation of the preretirement planning program.

(5) The costs of the preretirement planning program shall be charged back to the retirement system.

(6) An employer shall provide each member leave with pay to attend up to two preretirement planning programs or the equivalent of up to sixteen hours of preretirement planning programs. For purposes of this subsection, leave with pay means a day off paid by an employer and does not mean vacation, sick, personal, or compensatory time. A member may choose to attend a program more than twice, but such leave shall be at the expense of the member and shall be at the discretion of the employer. A member shall not be entitled to attend more than one preretirement planning program per fiscal year prior to actual election of retirement.

(7) A nominal registration fee may be charged to each person attending a preretirement planning program to cover the costs for meals, meeting rooms, or other expenses incurred under such program.

Laws 2011, LB509, § 36;

Laws 2013, LB263, § 28;

Laws 2016, LB447, § 44;

Laws 2021, LB147, § 40;

Laws 2022, LB700, § 10;

Laws 2024, LB198, § 15;

Laws 2025, LB295, § 16.